Missouri, session 2026, HB1796.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.280, 436.345, 442.404, 534.602, 534.604, and 569.200,
RSMo, are repealed and seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
67.280, 67.488, 436.345, 442.404, 534.602, 534.604, and 569.200, to read as follows:
67.280. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Code", any published compilation of rules prepared by various technical trade
associations, federal agencies, this state or any agency thereof, but shall be limited to:
regulations concerning the construction of buildings and continued occupancy thereof;
mechanical, plumbing, and electrical construction; and fire prevention;
(2) "Community", any county, fire protection district or municipality;
(3) "County", any county in the state;
(4) "Fire protection district", any fire protection district in the state;
(5) "Municipality", any incorporated city, town or village.
2. Any community, if the community otherwise has the power under the law to adopt
such an ordinance, may adopt or repeal an ordinance which incorporates by reference the
provisions of any code or portions of any code, or any amendment thereof, properly identified
as to date and source, without setting forth the provisions of such code in full. At least one
copy of such code, portion or amendment which is incorporated or adopted by reference, shall
be filed in the office of the clerk of the community and there kept available for public use,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1796 2
inspection, and examination. The filing requirements herein prescribed shall not be deemed
to be complied with unless the required copies of such codes, portion, or amendment or public
record are filed with the clerk of such community for a period of ninety days prior to the
adoption of the ordinance which incorporates such code, portion, or amendment by reference.
3. Any ordinance adopting a code, portion, or amendment by reference shall state the
penalty for violating such code, portion, or amendment, or any provisions thereof separately,
and no part of any such penalty shall be incorporated by reference.
4. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no county or
municipality shall enact, adopt, or maintain any ordinance, resolution, regulation, code,
or policy that mandates an owner, builder, or developer to implement green or otherwise
excessive building design and construction practices that threaten affordability in the
construction, maintenance, repair, or renovation of one- or two-family dwellings,
condominiums, or multiunit townhouses including, but not limited to:
(a) Sustainable building standards or features;
(b) High-performance standards or features;
(c) Energy efficiency standards or features;
(d) Environmentally responsive standards or features;
(e) Standards or features exceeding standards or features defined in the 2009
International Residential Code (IRC); or
(f) Standards established in the 2009 International Energy Conservation Code
(IECC).
(2) An ordinance, resolution, regulation, code, or policy enacted, adopted, or
maintained in violation of this subsection shall be null and void.
67.488. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Building Permit
Reform Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the term "exempt homeowner" means a resident,
noncorporate owner of a detached, single-family residence.
3. (1) No political subdivision shall require an exempt homeowner to obtain any
license, certification, or professional registration or submit to any examination or testing
as a condition of applying for or using a building or construction permit, provided all
work is performed by the owner or other current resident.
(2) If an exempt homeowner transfers ownership of the property within one year
of completing any work performed under the provisions of this subsection, the relevant
political subdivision is permitted to assess a one-time administrative fee in an amount
not to exceed five thousand dollars. The homeowner shall be informed of this potential
administrative fee at the time of permit application.

HB 1796 3
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the enforcement of
any applicable building codes or relevant inspections as otherwise required by
ordinance or law.
(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit an owner from
hiring a contractor otherwise authorized by law to perform work on behalf of the owner.
(5) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to:
(a) Any structure being rented, leased, subleased, or otherwise occupied outside
of the owner's principal residence;
(b) Any gas appliance installation or repair or any work that requires the
installation or modification of any device or delivery system that utilizes a combustible
fuel source; or
(c) The act of making a direct connection to publicly provided water or sewer
service, or the modification to such existing connections at the point of service.
4. No political subdivision shall require any permit, license, variance, or other
type of prior approval for an exempt homeowner to perform any of the following
activities, provided all work is performed by the owner or other current resident:
(1) Replacing an existing electric appliance with a substantially similar one,
provided no major additions or modifications to existing building wiring are performed;
(2) Replacing an existing sink, faucet, or dishwasher, provided no major
modifications to existing building plumbing are performed;
(3) Repairing, replacing, or installing gypsum board, plaster, or any other
nonstructural interior wall covering or cladding; and
(4) Repairing, replacing, or installing carpet, tile, vinyl, or other floor coverings.
5. Any political subdivision that fails to perform an inspection under a permit
within ten business days of a request made by an exempt homeowner shall refund fifty
percent of any charges assessed for the permit. If the inspection is not performed within
twenty business days from the initial request, the political subdivision shall waive the
inspection requirements and allow the exempt homeowner to proceed as if the exempt
homeowner had passed the inspection.
6. No exempt homeowner shall be charged a fee to extend or renew an expiring
building or construction permit, provided the permit is not allowed to expire prior to
renewal. No limit shall be placed on the number of extensions or renewals of permits
issued to exempt homeowners unless the work being performed is visible from
neighboring properties or adjacent streets. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to prohibit a political subdivision from requiring job sites with uncompleted work to be
maintained in a state that does not pose an imminent threat to public health or safety.

HB 1796 4
7. No exempt homeowner shall be assessed a fine or fee for work done without a
permit in an amount greater than double the charge that would have been assessed if the
permit had been issued at the time the unpermitted work was discovered.
8. No exempt homeowner shall be required to destroy, remove, or substantially
alter any structure or part of a structure upon which work was previously done without
permits unless the political subdivision having jurisdiction can demonstrate through
photographic or similar objective evidence that the work performed did not meet
applicable building codes or safety standards in place at the time the work was
performed.
9. (1) No political subdivision shall issue a stop-work order, citation, penalty, or
requirement for remediation for any ordinance or building code violation discovered
during an inspection if the violation found is outside the scope of work that was
requested to be inspected.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to prohibit the production of a
report detailing such violations found, provided the report is provided directly to the
homeowner for informational purposes only and is not retained or otherwise utilized or
distributed by the political subdivision or its agents.
10. Any exempt homeowner who applies for any building or construction permit
and subsequently fails an inspection performed pursuant to such permit shall be
informed in writing as to the reasons the inspection was deemed a failure and the actions
required to be taken to pass a follow-up inspection.
11. No exempt homeowner shall be assessed a charge to reinspect previously
inspected work for an amount that exceeds the cost of the initial permit or inspection
unless a period of over ninety days has elapsed since the original inspection.
12. If the state or any of its political subdivisions enacts a statute, ordinance, or
administrative rule that incorporates by reference any third-party standard or code
otherwise subject to copyright protection, the state or political subdivision responsible
for the statute, ordinance, or administrative rule shall provide, upon request and free of
charge in a digital or physical format, the third-party standard or code incorporated by
reference. Access to a physical format in a temporary or time-limited manner is
sufficient to meet the requirements of this subsection, provided that a physical copy may
remain in the possession of the requester until the completion of any currently permitted
work. The state or political subdivision shall pay all costs associated with providing the
third-party standard or code, except that the state or political subdivision may
alternatively declare by executive or administrative act that the provisions of the
standard or code incorporated by reference shall be repealed and not enforced until
such repeal is achieved.

HB 1796 5
13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no agent of a
political subdivision shall have the authority to enter into a private residence for the
purpose of performing a safety inspection or investigation into municipal or code
violations without first securing permission from the property owner or the owner's
designee or a warrant from a court of competent jurisdiction.
14. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any political subdivision
to enact any building codes or standards where none currently exist.
436.345. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no political
subdivision shall require a property owner to have a home inspection conducted of a
residential property prior to the sale of the property.
2. This [provision] section shall not apply to any inspection requirement of new
construction or occupancy permits.
442.404. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Homeowners' association", a nonprofit corporation or unincorporated association
of homeowners created under a declaration to own and operate portions of a planned
community or other residential subdivision that has the power under the declaration to assess
association members to pay the costs and expenses incurred in the performance of the
association's obligations under the declaration or tenants-in-common with respect to the
ownership of common ground or amenities of a planned community or other residential
subdivision. This term shall not include a condominium unit owners' association as defined
and provided for in subdivision (3) of section 448.1-103 or a residential cooperative;
(2) "Political signs", any fixed, ground-mounted display in support of or in opposition
to a person seeking elected office or a ballot measure excluding any materials that may be
attached;
(3) "Solar panel or solar collector", a device used to collect and convert solar energy
into electricity or thermal energy[,] including, but not limited to, photovoltaic cells or panels,
or solar thermal systems.
2. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the display of political signs.
(2) A homeowners' association has the authority to adopt reasonable rules, subject to
any applicable statutes or ordinances, regarding the time, size, place, number, and manner of
display of political signs.
(3) (a) A homeowners' association may remove a political sign without liability if
such sign:
a. Is placed within the common ground[,];
b. Threatens the public health or safety[,];
c. Violates an applicable statute or ordinance[,];

HB 1796 6
d. Is accompanied by sound or music[,]; or
e. If any other materials are attached to the political sign.
(b) Subject to [the foregoing] paragraph (a) of this subdivision, a homeowners'
association shall not remove a political sign from the property of a homeowner or impose any
fine or penalty upon the homeowner unless it has given such homeowner three days after
providing written notice to the homeowner, which notice shall specifically identify the rule
and the nature of the violation.
3. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall limit or prohibit, or have the effect of limiting or prohibiting, the installation of
solar panels or solar collectors on the rooftop of any property or structure.
(2) A homeowners' association may adopt reasonable rules, subject to any applicable
statutes or ordinances, regarding the placement of solar panels or solar collectors to the extent
that those rules do not:
(a) Prevent the installation of the device[,];
(b) Impair the functioning of the device[,];
(c) Restrict the use of the device[,]; or
(d) Adversely affect the cost or efficiency of the device.
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall apply only with regard to rooftops that are
owned, controlled, and maintained by the owner of the individual property or structure.
4. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the display of sale signs on the
property of a homeowner or property owner including, but not limited to, any yard on the
property, or nearby street corners.
(2) A homeowners' association has the authority to adopt reasonable rules, subject to
any applicable statutes or ordinances, regarding the time, size, place, number, and manner of
display of sale signs.
(3) (a) A homeowners' association may remove a sale sign without liability if such
sign:
a. Is placed within the common ground[,];
b. Threatens the public health or safety[,];
c. Violates an applicable statute or ordinance[,];
d. Is accompanied by sound or music[,]; or
e. If any other materials are attached to the sale sign.
(b) Subject to [the foregoing] paragraph (a) of this subdivision, a homeowners'
association shall not remove a sale sign from the property of a homeowner or property owner
or impose any fine or penalty upon the homeowner or property owner unless it has given such
homeowner or property owner three business days after the homeowner or property owner

HB 1796 7
receives written notice from the homeowners' association, which notice shall specifically
identify the rule and the nature of the alleged violation.
5. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting ownership or pasturing of up to six
chickens on a lot that is two-tenths of an acre or larger, including prohibitions against a single
chicken coop designed to accommodate up to six chickens.
(2) A homeowners' association may adopt reasonable rules, subject to applicable
statutes or ordinances, regarding ownership or pasturing of chickens, including a prohibition
or restriction on ownership or pasturing of roosters.
534.602. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Petitioner", the property owner, or an authorized agent of a property owner, of
property containing a residential dwelling who has filed a verified petition under the
provisions of this section;
(2) "Respondent", the person or persons unlawfully occupying property containing a
residential dwelling, against whom a verified petition has been filed;
(3) "Unlawful occupant" or "unlawful occupants", any person or persons who detain,
occupy, or trespass on property containing a residential dwelling without the permission of
the property owner, who otherwise have no legal right to occupy the property under state law,
and who are not afforded any protections provided to a tenant under state law.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a property owner or
[his or her] such owner's authorized agent may seek relief for the removal of a person or
persons unlawfully occupying property containing a residential dwelling under this section by
filing a verified petition in the county or city not within a county where the property is
located.
3. Except as provided in subsection 6 of this section, clerks of the court under the
supervision of a circuit clerk shall explain to the property owner or [his or her] such owner's
authorized agent not represented by counsel the procedures for filing all forms and pleadings
necessary for the presentation of [his or her] such owner'spetition to the court. Notice of the
fact that clerks will provide such assistance shall be conspicuously posted in the clerks'
offices. The location of the office where a petition can be filed shall be conspicuously posted
in the court building. The performance of duties prescribed in this section shall not constitute
the practice of law as defined in section 484.010. All duties of the clerk prescribed in this
section shall be performed without cost to the litigants. The supreme court may promulgate
rules as necessary to govern conduct of court clerks under this section and shall provide forms
for petitions and written instructions on filling out all forms and pleadings necessary for the
presentation of the petition to the court.

HB 1796 8
4. Filing fees and court costs under this section shall be the same as filing fees and
court costs required when filing a claim in associate circuit court.
5. (1) Upon the filing of a verified petition under this section, and for good cause
shown in the verified petition, the court shall immediately issue an ex parte order to remove
the respondent. The assertion of sufficient evidence that the person or persons are unlawfully
occupying property containing a residential dwelling shall constitute good cause for purposes
of this section. The verified petition shall set forth the following:
(a) The petitioner is the property owner or authorized agent of the property owner;
(b) The property that is being occupied includes a residential dwelling;
(c) An unlawful occupant or unlawful occupants have entered and remain or continue
to reside on the property owner's property;
(d) The real property was not open to members of the public at the time the unlawful
occupant or unlawful occupants entered;
(e) The unlawful occupant or unlawful occupants are occupying the property without
the permission of the property owner and are not guests of the property owner nor otherwise
authorized to make use of the property;
(f) The property owner has directed the unlawful occupant or unlawful occupants to
leave the property and the unlawful occupant or unlawful occupants have failed or refused to
vacate the premises;
(g) The property has not been leased to any person for three consecutive months, and
the unlawful occupant or unlawful occupants are not current or former tenants of the property
pursuant to any agreement with the property owner;
(h) The unlawful occupant or unlawful occupants are not immediate family members
of the property owner; and
(i) There is no pending litigation related to the real property between the property
owner and any known unlawful occupant or unlawful occupants.
(2) An ex parte order to have the unlawful occupant or unlawful occupants removed
from property containing a residential dwelling entered by the court shall take effect when
entered and shall remain in effect until there is valid service of process and a hearing is held
on the motion. Such hearing shall be held within forty-eight hours of filing the verified
petition unless good cause is shown for a delay. The court shall deny the ex parte order and
dismiss the petition if the petitioner is not authorized to seek relief or does not show good
cause.
(3) Failure to serve an ex parte order on the respondent shall not affect the validity or
enforceability of such order.
6. Any ex parte order granted under this section shall be to protect the petitioner from
trespass by an unlawful occupant or unlawful occupants and may include such terms as the

HB 1796 9
court reasonably deems necessary to ensure the petitioner's safety including, but not limited
to:
(1) Restraining the respondent from committing or threatening to commit any act of
violence, molestation, stalking, assault, or disturbing the peace of the petitioner or the
petitioner's property, including violence against a pet;
(2) Restraining the respondent from entering the petitioner's premises or dwelling unit
or coming within a certain proximity of the petitioner's premises or dwelling unit; and
(3) Restraining the respondent from communicating with the petitioner in any manner
or through any medium.
7. When the court has, after a hearing on the petition, issued an order for relief to
permanently exclude an unlawful occupant or unlawful occupants from the petitioner's
property, [it] the court may additionally:
(1) Permanently restrain the respondent from committing or threatening to commit
any act of violence, molestation, stalking, assault, or disturbing the peace of the petitioner or
the petitioner's property, including violence against a pet;
(2) Permanently restrain the respondent from entering the petitioner's premises or
dwelling unit or coming within a certain proximity of the petitioner's premises or dwelling
unit;
(3) Permanently restrain the respondent from communicating with the petitioner in
any manner or through any medium;
(4) Permanently expel the respondent from occupying the petitioner's premises or
dwelling unit;
(5) Permanently expel the respondent's personal property from the petitioner's
premises or dwelling unit;
(6) Order the respondent to pay all costs of repair to the petitioner's premises or
dwelling unit relating to damages caused by the respondent;
(7) Order the respondent to pay all costs associated with service of any ex parte order
authorized against the respondent; or
(8) Order the respondent to pay court costs.
8. A verified petition seeking an ex parte order under this section shall contain
allegations relating to those orders and shall pray for the orders desired.
9. Once the court grants an order under this section, the sheriff of the county or city
not within a county in which the property is located shall enforce such order by removing the
respondent from the property.
10. If appropriate, the sheriff may arrest any person found in the dwelling for
100 trespass, outstanding warrants, or any other legal cause.

HB 1796 10
101 11. The sheriff is entitled to the same fee for the service of the ex parte order granted
102 under this section as if the sheriff were serving a writ of possession under section 57.280.
103 After the sheriff serves the order, the property owner or authorized agent may request that the
104 sheriff stand by to keep the peace while the property owner or agent of the property owner
105 changes the locks and removes the personal property of the unlawful occupants from the
106 premises to or near the property line. When such a request is made, the sheriff may charge a
107 reasonable hourly rate, and the person requesting the sheriff to stand by and keep the peace is
108 responsible for paying the reasonable hourly rate set by the sheriff. The sheriff shall not be
109 liable to the unlawful occupant or occupants or to any other party for the loss, destruction, or
110 damage of property. The property owner or [his or her] such owner's authorized agent shall
111 not be liable to an unlawful occupant or any other party for the loss, destruction, or damage to
112 the personal property unless the removal was wrongful.
113 12. A person may bring a civil cause of action if the person was removed from the
114 property under this section without just cause. Such person may seek restored possession to
115 the real property, actual damages to personal property when personal property was removed,
116 statutory damages in the amount of one thousand dollars, and reimbursement of court costs.
117 Any damages authorized under this subsection shall be offset by any damages to the real
118 property inflicted by the person who was removed from the real property without just cause.
119 Such damages to real property shall be proven by the property owner. Awards of actual
120 damages shall not exceed the value of the damaged personal property.
121 13. The provisions of this section do not limit the rights of a property owner or limit
122 the authority of a law enforcement officer to arrest an unlawful occupant for trespassing,
123 vandalism, theft, or other crimes.
124 14. All proceedings under this section are in addition to any other available civil or
125 criminal remedies, unless otherwise specifically provided in this section.
126 15. (1) The court shall retain jurisdiction over the ex parte order or full order of
127 protection issued under this section for its entire duration. The court may schedule
128 compliance review hearings to monitor the respondent's compliance with the order.
129 (2) The terms of the ex parte order or full order of protection issued under this section
130 are enforceable by all remedies available at law for the enforcement of a judgment, and the
131 court may punish a respondent who willfully violates the ex parte order to the same extent as
132 provided by law for contempt of the court in any other suit or proceeding cognizable by the
133 court.
534.604. 1. When a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that a
party, against whom an ex parte order under section 534.602 has been entered and who has
notice of such order entered, has committed an act in violation of such order, the law

HB 1796 11
enforcement officer shall arrest the offending party-respondent regardless of whether the
violation occurred in the presence of the arresting law enforcement officer.
2. In an arrest in which a law enforcement officer acted in good faith reliance on this
section, the arresting and assisting law enforcement officers and their employing entities and
superiors shall be immune from liability in any civil action alleging false arrest, false
imprisonment, or malicious prosecution.
3. (1) A violation of the terms and conditions of an ex parte order under section
534.602 shall be a class A misdemeanor.
(2) For the purposes of this subsection, in addition to the notice provided by actual
service of the order, a party is deemed to have notice of an ex parte order under section
534.602 if:
[(1)] (a) The law enforcement officer responding to a call of a violation of an ex parte
order under section 534.602 presented a copy of the ex parte order to the respondent; or
[(2)] (b) Notice is given by actual communication to the respondent in a manner
reasonably likely to advise the respondent.
4. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as creating a civil cause of action for
damages to enforce the provisions set forth in this section.
569.200. 1. A person commits the offense of criminal mischief if [he or she] such
person unlawfully detains, occupies, or trespasses upon a residential dwelling.
2. The offense of criminal mischief is a class A misdemeanor.
✔